Georgia, session 2025_26, HB369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 1 of Article 1 of Chapter 8 of Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to general provisions relative to equipment of motor vehicles, is amended by adding
a new Code section to read as follows:
"40-8-12.
(a) On and after January 1, 2026, any motor vehicle used for the mobile sale of food or
beverages which primarily conducts such sales during stops upon a roadway shall be
equipped with the following:
(1) Four hooded or recessed red flasher lights or four red flasher lights and four amber
flasher lights mounted on the same horizontal centerline as the red lights and nearer the
H. B. 369
- 1 -

LC 39 9001
centerline. Such amber lights shall be at least two and one-half times brighter than the
red lights;
(2) A signal arm that can be extended horizontally from the left side of the vehicle that
is a triangular shape, yellow in color, and contains the words 'caution,' 'slow,' or
'children'; and
(3) A sign mounted upon the rear of the motor vehicle that shall be at least three square
feet in size and display a warning that the vehicle makes frequent stops.
(b) The Department of Public Safety shall be authorized to adopt rules and regulations for
the purposes of this Code section."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 369
- 2 -